Illinois, session 104th, SB2370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; purpose. 5    (a) This Act may be cited as the Military Installation and 6Critical Infrastructure Protection Act.7    (b) The purpose of this Act is to protect military 8installations and State critical infrastructure by prohibiting 9foreign adversaries from purchasing land near military bases 10and from investing in and accessing State critical 11infrastructure. 12    Section 2. Definitions. In this Act:13    (a) "Agricultural land" means a land area that is either 14arable, under permanent crops, or under permanent pastures. 15Arable land includes land under temporary crops such as 16cereals, temporary meadows for mowing or pasture, land under 17market or kitchen gardens, and land temporarily fallow. Land 18abandoned as a result of shifting cultivation is excluded. 19Land under permanent crops is cultivated with crops that 20occupy the land for long periods and need not be replanted 21after each harvest, such as orchards or vineyards. This 22category excludes land under trees grown for wood or timber. 23Permanent pasture land is land used for 5 or more years for   SB2370- 2 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1forage, including natural and cultivated crops. 2    (b) "Company" means a for-profit sole proprietorship, 3organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 4venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 5or limited liability company, including a wholly owned 6subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or 7affiliate of those entities or business associations that 8exists to make a profit; or a non-profit organization. 9    (c) "Critical infrastructure" means systems and assets, 10whether physical or virtual, so vital to Illinois or the 11United States of America that the incapacity or destruction of 12such systems and assets would have a debilitating impact on 13State or national security, State or national economic 14security, State or national public health, or any combination 15of those matters. A critical infrastructure may be publicly or 16privately owned, and includes, but is not limited to:17        (1) gas and oil production, storage, or delivery 18    systems;19        (2) water supply, refinement, storage, or delivery 20    systems;21        (3) telecommunications networks;22        (4) electrical power delivery systems;23        (5) emergency services;24        (6) transportation systems and services; or25        (7) personal data or otherwise classified information 26    storage systems, including cybersecurity.  SB2370- 3 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    (d) "Cybersecurity" means the measures taken to protect a 2computer, computer network, computer system, or other 3technology infrastructure against unauthorized use or access. 4    (e) "Domicile" means either the country in which a company 5is registered, or where the company's affairs are primarily 6completed, or where the majority of ownership share is held.7    (f) "Foreign adversary" means the People's Republic of 8China, the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, 9the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of 10Cuba, the Venezuelan regime of Nicolas Maduro, or the Syrian 11Arab Republic, including any agent of or any other entity 12under significant control of such foreign adversary, or any 13other entity deemed by the Governor in consultation with the 14Attorney General of Illinois.15    (g) "Foreign entity" means any corporation, business 16association, partnership, trust, society, or any other entity 17or group that is not incorporated or organized to do business 18in the United States, as well as international organizations, 19foreign governments, and any agency or subdivision of foreign 20governments.21    (h) "Foreign principal" means:22        (1) the government or any official of the government 23    of a foreign adversary;24        (2) a political party or member of a political party 25    or any subdivision of a political party of a foreign 26    adversary;  SB2370- 4 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1        (3) a partnership, association, corporation, 2    organization, or other combination of persons organized 3    under the laws of or having its principal place of 4    business in a foreign adversary, or a subsidiary of such 5    entity, or owned or controlled wholly or in part by any 6    person, entity, or collection of persons or entities of a 7    foreign adversary;8        (4) any person who is domiciled in a foreign adversary 9    and is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the 10    United States; or11        (5) any person, entity, or collection of persons or 12    entities, described in paragraphs (a) through (d) having a 13    controlling interest in a partnership, association, 14    corporation, organization, trust, or any other legal 15    entity or subsidiary formed for the purpose of owning real 16    property. 17    (i) "Non-notified transactions" means foreign investments 18in the United States that are not voluntarily submitted to the 19Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States for 20review under 50 U.S.C. 4565.21    (j) "Operational software" means computer programs used 22for the operation, control, maneuver or maintenance of State 23infrastructure, or any other computer program applications 24related to State infrastructure.25    (k) "Software" means any program or routine, or any set of 26one or more programs or routines, which are used or intended   SB2370- 5 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1for use to cause one or more computers or pieces of computer 2related peripheral equipment, or any combination thereof, to 3perform a task or set of tasks, as it relates to State 4infrastructure, or any operational software. 5    (l) "State infrastructure" means Critical Infrastructure 6and Transportation Infrastructure.7    (m) "Transportation infrastructure" includes, but is not 8limited to:9        (1) Airports, including but not limited to commercial 10    and intermodal airports and heliports; and all airport 11    infrastructure.12        (2) Roadways, including but not limited to publicly 13    accessible streets, roads, highways, and bridges; and all 14    roadway infrastructure, including but not limited to 15    signage, toll booths, weigh stations, and traffic signals.16        (3) Railways, including but not limited to all classes 17    of freight rail and passenger rail; and all railway 18    infrastructure, including but not limited to intermodal 19    rail yards and signals.20        (4) Ports, including but not limited to inland ports, 21    seaports, deepwater ports, inland waterways, and levees; 22    and all port infrastructure, including but not limited to 23    intermodal stations.24        (5) Public transit, including bus, ferry, cable car, 25    tram, trolley, and other types of publicly accessible 26    transportation; and all public transit infrastructure.   SB2370- 6 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    (n) "Military base or installation" means any land, 2structure, or property owned or controlled by any division of 3the Department of Defense, Illinois National Guard, or any 4other department of government, State or federal, critical to 5the safety and security of Illinois or the United States of 6America.  7    Section 3. Agricultural land purchases. 8    (a) A foreign principal from a foreign adversary country 9may not directly or indirectly own, have an interest of 10greater than 25% in, or acquire by purchase, grant, devise, or 11descent agricultural land or any interest, except a de minimis 12indirect interest, in such land in this State. A foreign 13principal has a de minimis indirect interest if any ownership 14is the result of the foreign principal's ownership of 15registered equities in a publicly traded company owning the 16land and if the foreign principal's ownership in the country 17is either:18        (1) less than 5% of any class of registered equities 19    or less than 5% in the aggregate in multiple classes of 20    registered equities; or21        (2) a noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled 22    by a company that is both registered with the United 23    States Securities and Exchange Commission as an investment 24    advisor under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as 25    amended, and is not a foreign entity.   SB2370- 7 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    (b) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns 2or otherwise controls agricultural land, as defined in 3subsection (a), in this State must sell, transfer, or 4otherwise divest itself of the agricultural land within 180 5days of the effective date of this Act. 6    (c) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns 7or acquires agricultural land or any interest in such land in 8this State must register with the Department of Agriculture 9within 60 days of the enactment of this Act or the date of 10acquisition, whichever is latest. The Department must 11establish a form for such registration, which, at minimum, 12must include all of the following:13        (1) The name of the owner of the agricultural land or 14    the owner of the interest in such land;15        (2) The address of the agricultural land, the property 16    appraiser's parcel identification number, and the 17    property's legal description; and18        (3) The number of acres of the agricultural land. 19    (d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a foreign principal 20from a foreign adversary country may acquire agricultural land 21on or after the passage of this Act, by devise or descent, 22through the enforcement of security interests, or through the 23collection of debts, provided that the foreign principal 24sells, transfers, or otherwise divests itself of the 25agricultural land within 180 days of acquiring the 26agricultural land.   SB2370- 8 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    (e) Any current deeds, contracts, rental agreements, or 2other legal agreements in conflict with this Act shall be 3deemed invalid from the date of adoption unless otherwise 4provided. 5    (f) The Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to 6implement this Section. 7    (g) The responsibility for determining whether an entity 8is subject to this Section rests solely with the foreign 9entity, the Attorney General of Illinois, any qualifying 10whistleblower, and no other individual or entity. An 11individual or entity who is not a foreign entity shall not be 12required to determine or inquire whether another person or 13entity is or may be subject to this Section, and shall bear no 14civil or criminal liability under this Section.15    (h) If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary 16country does not divest the public or private lands as 17required by this Section, the Attorney General shall commence 18an action in the circuit court within the jurisdiction of the 19public or private land.20    (i) If the public or private land is held in violation of 21this Section, the circuit court shall order that the public or 22private land be sold through judicial foreclosure.23    (j) If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture 24of land or other assets held in violation of this Section, the 25whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to 30% of the 26proceeds of the land sale that results from the violation of   SB2370- 9 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1this Section after payments to lienholders. Proceeds of the 2sale shall be disbursed in the following order, as applicable:3        (1) The payment of authorized costs of the sale, 4    including all approved fees and expenses of the referee 5    and any taxes and assessments due. 6        (2) The payment, in an amount approved by the court, 7    to the Attorney General for reimbursement of investigation 8    and litigation costs and expenses. 9        (3) To bona fide lien holders, in their order of 10    priority, except for liens which under the terms of the 11    sale are to remain on the property.12        (4) To whistleblowers.13        (5) To the restricted foreign entity.  14    Section 4. Prohibited lease or purchase of land or 15dwellings near military installations. 16    (a) A foreign principal from a foreign adversary country 17shall not be allowed to directly or indirectly purchase, hold, 18rent, or otherwise control any property within 25 miles of a 19military base or installation. 20    (b) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly 21controls any property covered by subsection (a), excluding 22temporary contractual agreements such as rental or lease 23agreements, must sell, transfer, or otherwise divest itself of 24the property within 180 days of the passage of this Act.25    (c) Any current deeds, contracts, rental agreements, or   SB2370- 10 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1other legal agreements in conflict with this Act shall be 2deemed invalid from the date of adoption unless otherwise 3provided. 4    (d) If a foreign principal from a foreign adversary 5country does not divest the public or private lands as 6required by this Section, the Attorney General shall commence 7an action in the circuit court within the jurisdiction of the 8public or private land.9    (e) If the public or private land is held in violation of 10this Section, the circuit court shall order that the public or 11private land be sold through judicial foreclosure.12    (f) If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture 13of land or other assets held in violation of this Section, the 14whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to 30% of the 15proceeds of the land sale that results from the violation of 16this Section after payments to lienholders. Proceeds of the 17sale shall be disbursed in the following order, as applicable:18        (1) The payment of authorized costs of the sale, 19    including all approved fees and expenses of the referee 20    and any taxes and assessments due. 21        (2) The payment, in an amount approved by the court, 22    to the Attorney General for reimbursement of investigation 23    and litigation costs and expenses. 24        (3) To bona fide lien holders, in their order of 25    priority, except for liens which under the terms of the 26    sale are to remain on the property.  SB2370- 11 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1        (4) To whistleblowers.2        (5) To the restricted foreign entity. 3    (g) The responsibility for determining whether an entity 4is subject to this Section rests solely with the foreign 5entity, the Attorney General of Illinois, any qualifying 6whistleblower, and no other individual or entity. An 7individual or entity who is not a foreign entity shall not be 8required to determine or inquire whether another person or 9entity is or may be subject to this Section, and shall bear no 10civil or criminal liability under this Section.  11    Section 5. Whistleblower enforcement reward. 12    (a) Any individual may act as a whistleblower and provide 13a referral to the Office of the Illinois Attorney General for 14violations of Section 3 and Section 4 of this Act.15    (b) If a whistleblower referral results in a divestiture 16of land or other assets held in violation of this Act, the 17whistleblower shall be entitled to a reward equal to 30% of the 18proceeds of the land sale that results from violation of this 19Act.20    (c) The whistleblower enforcement provision takes effect 21180 days after the effective date of this Act. 22    Section 6. Prohibited access to critical infrastructure. 23    (a) An entity constructing, repairing, operating, or 24otherwise having significant access to critical infrastructure   SB2370- 12 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1may not enter into an agreement relating to critical 2infrastructure in this State with a foreign principal from a 3foreign adversary country, or use products or services 4produced by a foreign principal from a foreign adversary 5country.6    (b) A governmental entity may not enter into a contract or 7other agreement relating to critical infrastructure in this 8State with a company that is a foreign principal from a foreign 9adversary country, or use products or services produced by a 10foreign principal from a foreign adversary country.11    (c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), an entity or 12governmental entity may enter into a contract or agreement 13relating to critical infrastructure with a foreign principal 14from a foreign adversary country or use products or services 15produced by a foreign principal from a foreign adversary 16country if:17        (1) there is no other reasonable option for addressing 18    the need relevant to State critical infrastructure;19        (2) the contract is pre-approved by Illinois Emergency 20    Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security; and21        (3) not entering into such a contract or agreement 22    would pose a greater threat to the State than the threat 23    associated with entering into the contract.  24    Section 7. Requirements for access to critical 25infrastructure.   SB2370- 13 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    (a) In order to access critical infrastructure, a company 2must file a certification form with and pay a certification 3fee to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 4Homeland Security. The Agency shall prescribe the registration 5form to be filed pursuant to this Section.6    (b) To maintain registration as a company with access to 7critical infrastructure, a company must:8        (1) identify all employee positions in the 9    organization that have access to critical infrastructure;10        (2) before hiring a person described in subdivision 11    (a) or allowing such person to continue to have access to 12    critical infrastructure, obtain from the Illinois State 13    Police or a private vendor criminal history record 14    information relating to the prospective employee and any 15    other background information considered necessary by the 16    company or required by the Agency to protect critical 17    infrastructure from foreign adversary infiltration or 18    interference; 19        (3) prohibit foreign nationals from an adversary 20    nation from access to critical infrastructure; and21        (4) be compliant with Section 6 of this Act. 22    (c) The Agency shall set the fee in an amount sufficient to 23cover the costs of administering the certification process but 24not to exceed $150.25    (d) The Agency shall provide that a company is compliant 26with all requirements of this Section or revoke certification.    SB2370- 14 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    Section 8. Prohibitions on certain software in critical 2infrastructure. 3    (a) All software used in State infrastructure located 4within or serving Illinois shall henceforth not include any 5software produced by a federally banned corporation, nor any 6software banned at the federal level.7    (b) All software used in State infrastructure located 8within or serving Illinois shall henceforth not include any 9software produced in or by a foreign adversary, a State-owned 10enterprise of a foreign adversary, or a company domiciled 11within a foreign adversary. 12    (c) All software used in State infrastructure in operation 13within or serving Illinois, to include any State 14infrastructure which is not permanently disabled, shall have 15all software prohibited by subsection (a) or (b)removed and 16replaced with software that is not prohibited by subsection 17(a) or (b). 18    (d) Any State infrastructure provider that removes, 19discontinues, or replaces any prohibited software shall not be 20required to obtain any additional permits from any State 21agency or political subdivision for the removal, 22discontinuance, or replacement of such software as long as the 23State agency or political subdivision is properly notified of 24the necessary replacements and the replacement software is 25similar to the existing software.   SB2370- 15 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    Section 9. Reporting non-notified transactions. 2    (a) The Office of the Illinois Attorney General shall 3establish a process by which local officials, states 4officials, or other persons may submit information or concerns 5to the Office regarding non-notified transactions in Illinois. 6The Office of the Illinois Attorney General may adopt any 7necessary rules to implement this subsection.8    (b) The Illinois Attorney General may submit a memorandum 9or report concerning non-notified transactions the Office of 10the Attorney General has identified in Illinois to the 11Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States. 12    (c) The Office of the Illinois Attorney General shall:13        (1) retain a copy of any documents submitted to the 14    committee described in subsection (b) that are included 15    with a memorandum or report submitted under that 16    subsection; and17        (2) notify the General Assembly and the Governor as 18    soon as practicable after submitting a memorandum, report, 19    or other information under subsection (b). 20    Section 10. Severability. If any provision of this Act, or 21the application of any provision to any person or 22circumstance, is held to be invalid, the remainder of this Act 23and the application of its provisions to any other person or 24circumstance shall not be affected thereby.   SB2370- 16 -LRB104 03774 JRC 13798 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22025.